Tennessee, session 114, HB0059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 56, Chapter 7, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "life insurance" has the same meaning as defined in
§ 56-2-201.
(b) For policies of or contracts for life insurance issued, amended, or renewed on
or after July 1, 2025, once the policy holder has made premium payments, in the
aggregate, equal to the amount of coverage under the life insurance policy, the issuer of
the life insurance policy is not entitled to further premium payments and shall not request
additional premium payments from the policy holder.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0059
000741
- 1 -